District of Columbia statutes.
7-2504.02

Qualifications for dealer’s license; application; fee.

(a)

Any person eligible to register a firearm under this unit and who, if a registrant, has not previously failed to perform any of the duties imposed by this unit; and, any person eligible under the acts of Congress to engage in such business, may obtain a dealer’s license, or a renewal thereof, which shall be valid for a period of not more than 1 year from the date of issuance. The license required by this unit, shall be in addition to any other license or licensing procedure required by law.

(b)

Each application for a dealer’s license and each application for renewal thereof shall be made on a form prescribed by the Chief, shall be sworn to or affirmed by the applicant, and shall contain:

(1)

The information required by § 7-2502.03(a);

(2)

The address where the applicant conducts or intends to conduct his business;

(3)

Whether the applicant, prior to September 24, 1976, held a license to deal in deadly weapons in the District; and

(4)

Such other information as the Chief may require, including fingerprints and photographs of the applicant, to carry out the purposes of this unit.

(c)

Each application for a dealer’s license, or renewal shall be accompanied by a fee established by the Mayor; provided, that such fee shall in the judgment of the Mayor, reimburse the District for the cost of services provided under this subchapter.

(d)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as a Public Safety endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of Chapter 28 of Title 47.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title IV, § 402, 23 DCR 2464
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(k)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(i)(2), 50 DCR 6913
This section is referenced in § 7-2504.04.
1981 Ed., § 6-2342.
1973 Ed., § 6-1842.
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (c), substituted “Public Safety endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Public Safety endorsement to a master business license under the master”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(i)(2) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 1-85, the Firearms Control Regulation Act of 1975